District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.11

Schedule V tests.

The Mayor shall place a substance in Schedule V if the Mayor finds that:

(1)

The substance has low potential for abuse relative to the controlled substances listed in Schedule IV;

(2)

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or the District of Columbia; and

(3)

The substance has limited physical dependence or psychological dependence liability relative to the controlled substances listed in Schedule IV.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 211, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-521.